Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

HB3052 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-101 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Sir Major
White-Bullock Child Protection and Family Notification Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-102 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Legislature finds that:
1. Repeated fentanyl-exposed births constitute a foreseeable
and preventable risk to infant safety;
2. Department of Human Services policies do not consistently
trigger enhanced intervention, cross-case review, or family
notification when a mother repeatedly gives birth to fentanyl-
positive infants;
3. The death of Sir Major White-Bullock, an eleven-month-old
child who died from fentanyl toxicity after documented repeated
prenatal exposure demonstrates a systemic failure, not a single
error; and
4. Stable family members are often willing and capable of
protecting children but are not notified due to procedural silos or
narrow interpretations of confidentiality.
B. It is the purpose of the Oklahoma Legislature to:

HB3052 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Close policy gaps that allow repeat prenatal fentanyl
exposure without escalated response;
2. Require enhanced intervention by the Department for repeat
fentanyl-exposed births;
3. Ensure qualified, stable family members are notified and
engaged as child welfare stakeholders;
4. Prioritize child safety while maintaining treatment access
and due process for parents; and
5. Enhance child safety and early intervention.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-103 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
When used in the Sir Major White-Bullock Child Protection and
Family Notification Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Fentanyl-exposed infant" means a newborn who tests positive
at birth for fentanyl or whose mother tests positive for fentanyl at
delivery;
2. "Enhanced child safety review" means a mandatory, multi-
disciplinary response by the Department of Human Services triggered
by repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure;
3. "Qualified familial child welfare stakeholder" means a
grandparent, adult sibling, aunt, uncle, or other adult relative
who:
a. has no substantiated child abuse or neglect findings,
HB3052 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. is willing to participate in safety planning or
placement, and
c. may serve as a temporary or permanent caregiver; and
4. "Repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure" means two or more
fentanyl-exposed births by the same parent within a five-year
period.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-104 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall initiate an enhanced
child safety review when a parent has:
1. A second fentanyl-exposed infant; or
2. Any subsequent fentanyl-exposed infant.
B. This review shall not be discretionary and shall include:
1. Case history review across all prior child welfare records;
2. Assessment of cumulative risk, not isolated incidents; and
3. Review of prior service compliance and outcomes.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-105 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon triggering an enhanced child safety review, the
Department of Human Services shall identify and notify qualified
familial child welfare stakeholders, unless the court finds

HB3052 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

noti fication would pose an immediate safety risk to the child or
parent.
B. Notification shall include:
1. The existence of repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure; and
2. The opportunity to participate in:
a. safety planning,
b. temporary or kinship placement, and
c. case staffing or family team meetings.
C. The Department may not withhold notification solely on
confidentiality grounds when:
1. The child's safety is at risk due to repeat exposure; and
2. The notified party is being considered for placement or
protective involvement.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-106 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
When repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure is identified, the
Department shall consider, at minimum:
1. Immediate safety planning prior to hospital discharge;
2. Supervised visitation requirements;
3. Kinship placement preference over foster placement;
4. Court-ordered substance use treatment with compliance
monitoring; and

HB3052 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Referral to specialized maternal addiction treatment
programs.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-107 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall establish a repeat
prenatal exposure tracking mechanism that:
1. Flags repeat cases statewide; and
2. Prevents case isolation across counties or service regions.
B. Hospitals and birthing facilities shall report fentanyl-
positive births to the Department in accordance with paragraph 3 of
subsection B of Section 1-2-101 of this title.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-108 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In cases involving repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure, the
court shall:
1. Receive a summary of prior involvement by the Department of
Human Services; and
2. Be informed whether family notification occurred and why.
B. In cases involving repeat prenatal fentanyl exposure, the
court may order:
1. Immediate kinship placement evaluations; and
2. Expanded protective supervision.
HB3052 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-109 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Nothing in this act shall:
1. Criminalize pregnancy or substance use disorder;
2. Deny access to reunification services; or
3. Eliminate parental rights without court findings.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-110 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules within
one hundred eighty (180) days of enactment and shall provide
training to staff of the Department, hospitals, and courts.
SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.








HB3052 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.